Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1215
Applicability of insurance laws; conflict; effect.

Reciprocal or interinsurance exchanges and all matters relating thereto shall be subject to and governed by Chapter 44, articles 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 12, and 15, as now existing or as hereafter amended, insofar as these statutes may be reasonably applicable; and sections 44-1201 to 44-1214 shall govern in the event of conflict between the application of the articles enumerated in this section.

Laws 1949, c. 154, § 1(2), p. 393;

Laws 1994, LB 852, § 1.